Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Board of Dental Examiners

§ 581.
Creation; qualifications.

The State Board of Dental Examiners is created and shall consist of six licensed dentists in good standing who have practiced in this State for a period of five years or more and are in active practice; two licensed dental hygienists who have practiced in this State for a period of at least three years immediately preceding the appointment and are in active practice; one registered dental assistant who has practiced in this State for a period of at least three years immediately preceding the appointment and is in active practice; and two members of the public who are not associated with the practice of dentistry.

Board members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

A member of the Board shall not be an officer or serve on a committee of his or her respective state or local professional dental, dental therapy, dental hygiene, or dental assisting organization.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016.

§ 582.
Authority of the Board.

In addition to any other provisions of law, the Board shall have the authority to:

provide general information to applicants;

explain complaint and appeal procedures to applicants, licensees, registrants, and the public;

adopt rules pursuant to the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act:

as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

relating to qualifications of applicants, examinations, and granting and renewal of licenses and registrations;

relating to the granting or renewal of a license to those who do not meet active practice requirements;

setting standards for the continuing education of persons licensed or registered under this chapter;

establishing requirements for licensing dental hygienists with five years of regulated practice experience;

setting educational standards and standards of practice for the administration of anesthetics in the dental office;

for the administration of local anesthetics by dental hygienists, including minimum education requirements and procedures for administration of local anesthetics;

setting guidelines for general supervision of dental hygienists, to be known as “public-health hygienists,” who may perform tasks in the settings set forth in section 624 of this chapter; and

prescribing minimum educational, training, experience, and supervision requirements and professional standards necessary for practice pursuant to this chapter as a dental assistant; and

undertake any other actions or procedures specified in, required by, or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2019, No. 30

, § 10.

§ 583.
Meetings.

The Board shall meet at least annually on the call of the Chair or two members.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 584.
Unprofessional conduct.

The Board may refuse to give an examination or issue a license to practice dentistry, to practice as a dental therapist, or to practice dental hygiene or to register an applicant to be a dental assistant and may suspend or revoke any such license or registration or otherwise discipline an applicant, licensee, or registrant for unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct means the following conduct and the conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

by an applicant or person licensed or registered under this chapter:

abandonment of a patient;

rendering professional services to a patient if the dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or dental assistant is intoxicated or under the influence of drugs;

promotion of the sale of drugs, devices, appliances, goods, or services provided for a patient in a manner to exploit the patient for financial gain or selling, prescribing, giving away, or administering drugs for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes;

division of or agreeing to divide with any person for bringing or referring a patient the fees received for providing professional services to the patient;

willful misrepresentation in treatments;

practicing a profession regulated under this chapter with a dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or dental assistant who is not legally practicing within the State or aiding or abetting such practice;

gross and deceptive overcharging for professional services on single or multiple occasions, including filing of false statements for collection of fees for which services are not rendered;

permitting one’s name, license, or registration to be used by a person, group, or corporation when not actually in charge of or responsible for the treatment given;

practicing dentistry or maintaining a dental office in a manner so as to endanger the health or safety of the public; or

holding out to the public as being specially qualified or announcing specialization in any branch of dentistry by using terms such as “specialist in” or “practice limited to” unless:

the American Dental Association has formally recognized the specialty and an appropriate certifying board for the specialty;

the dentist has met the educational requirements and standards set forth by the Commission on Dental Accreditation for the specialty; or

the dentist is a diplomate of the specialty certifying board recognized by the American Dental Association.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016.